Utah statutes.
72-4-208.   James V. Hansen Highway.
(1)  There is established the James V. Hansen Highway comprising a section of
Route 89 beginning in Farmington at the Route 89 and Interstate Highway 15
interchange north to Route 203, Harrison Boulevard in South Ogden.
(2)  In addition to other official designations, the Department of
Transportation shall designate the portions of the highway identified in
Subsection (1) as the James V. Hansen Highway on future state highway maps.
